North Carolina, session 2025, HB343.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Aging and Adult Services, the sum of three hundred
eighty thousand dollars ($380,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum
of three hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars ($397,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year, to create four full-time ombudsman positions within the Office of the State
Long-Term Care Ombudsman in the Division of Aging and Adult Services, in order to move
North Carolina toward national standards for long-term care ombudsman programs.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H343-v-1*